Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 31

Underground Utility Damage Prevention Act

65-31-101. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Underground Utility Damage Prevention Act.”

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-3201.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-305, 8-308, 8-1001, 8-1002.

65-31-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agricultural purposes,” for purposes of this chapter only, includes surface activities, such as plowing, planting, and combining, but does not include blasting, setting drainage tiles, subsoiling, or other subsurface activities;

“Blasting” means the use of an explosive device for the excavation of earth, rock, or other material or the demolition of a structure;

“Board” means the underground utility damage enforcement board, created by § 65-31-114;

“Calendar day” means a twenty-four (24) hour period beginning with the date and time that a notification to excavate or demolish is to begin, including Monday through Sunday and all holidays;

“Contract locator” means any person contracted with an operator, or operating on behalf of an operator, specifically to determine and mark the approximate location of the operator's utility lines that exist within the area specified by a notice served on the one-call service;

“Damage” includes the substantial weakening of structural or lateral support of an underground utility, penetration or destruction of any protective coating, housing or other protective device of an underground utility, the partial or complete severance of an underground utility and rendering any underground utility inaccessible;

“Demolish” or “demolition” means any operation by which a structure or mass of material is wrecked, razed, rendered, moved or removed by means of any tools, equipment, or discharge of explosives;

“Design locate request” means a communication to the one-call service in which a request for locating existing utility facilities for predesign or advance planning purposes is made;

“Excavate” or “excavation”:

Means an operation for the purpose of the movement, placement, or removal of earth, rock, or other materials in or on the ground by use of mechanized equipment or by discharge of explosives, and includes augering, backfilling, blasting, boring, digging, ditching, drilling, grading, pile-driving, plowing-in, pulling-in, ripping, scraping, sub-soiling, trenching, and tunneling; and

Does not include:

Pavement milling or pavement repair that does not exceed the depth of the existing base stone and pavement;

Routine railroad maintenance activities, including removal and replacement of base material up to twenty-four inches (24") below the flow line of the ditch or ground surface of the railroad right-of-way adjacent to the existing track structure if the work is conducted by railroad employees or railroad contractors and is carried out with reasonable care so as to protect any installed underground facilities placed in the railroad right-of-way by agreement with the railroad;

Routine road maintenance activities; and

The tilling of soil for agricultural purposes or the digging of holes for fence posts on private property in any area that is not located within a recorded easement of an operator or that is not located within one hundred feet (100') of the edge of the pavement of a street or highway;

“Excavator” means any person who engages in activities described in subdivisions (A) and (B) in the definition of “excavate” contained in this section;

“Executive committee” means the executive committee created by § 65-31-114(f);

“Impending emergency” means circumstances potentially dangerous to life, health, property, the environment or the repair or restoration of service, which would likely develop into an emergency, as defined in § 65-31-109, if excavation is not initiated within seventy-two (72) hours;

“Location” means the proposed area for which digging or excavating is scheduled within three (3) to ten (10) working days, such area not to exceed two thousand feet (2,000') in length unless an excavator and an operator or an operator's designated representative, such as a one-call service, agree to a larger area;

“Mechanized equipment” means equipment operated by means of mechanical power including trenchers, bulldozers, power shovels, augers, backhoes, scrapers, drills, cable and pipe plows and other equipment used for plowing-in or pulling-in cable or pipe;

“One-Call Service” means a telephone notification service described in § 65-31-107 that provides services to its members for the purposes of receiving and distributing notification regarding planned excavations or demolitions that are required under this chapter;

“Operator” means any person who owns or operates a utility;

“Person” means any individual; any corporation, partnership, association, or any other entity organized under the laws of any state; any state; any subdivision or instrumentality of a state; and any employee, agent, or legal representative thereof;

“Proposed area of excavation” means a general surface location which excavators are to furnish to operators of underground utilities or to a one-call service as defined in § 65-31-106. The proposed area of excavation does not constitute a specified depth for the purpose of complying with this chapter;

“Routine road maintenance activities”:

Means activities carried out by or for those responsible for publicly-maintained roadways if the activities:

Occur entirely within the right-of-way of a public road, street, or highway;

Are carried out with reasonable care so as to protect any utility-owned facilities and laterals placed in the right-of-way;

Are carried out within the limits of any original excavation on the traveled way, shoulders, or drainage ditches of a public road, street, or highway, and do not exceed eighteen inches (18") in depth below the flow line of the ditch or the grade existing prior to the activities; and

If involving the replacement of existing structures at a depth greater than eighteen inches (18"), replace those existing structures in their previous locations and at their previous depths; and

Does not include work on a roadway done pursuant to a contract awarded by a state or local government through a bid process for which plan drawings have been developed in advance;

“Utility”:

Means any line, system, or facility used for producing, storing, conveying, transmitting, or distributing communications, electricity, gas, petroleum, petroleum products, hazardous liquids, water, steam, sewerage, and other underground facilities; and

Does not include any railroad, the Tennessee department of transportation, or any natural flowing runoff systems;

“Willful noncompliance” means the intentional refusal or failure to perform, or comply with, a duty created or imposed by this chapter or by rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter; and

“Working day” means every day, except Saturday, Sunday, and national and legal state holidays. For purposes of measuring any period of time that requires notice under this chapter, a working day shall commence at the time the written notice or telephone call is received and shall expire at the same time on the next working day.

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 2; T.C.A., § 65-3202; Acts 1993, ch. 223, §§ 1-3; 1999, ch. 73, § 1; 2006, ch. 686, § 9; 2007, ch. 218, § 1; 2015, ch. 488, § 1; 2018, ch. 716, §§ 5, 10.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the definitions of “Excavate”, which read: “‘Excavate’ or ‘excavation’ means an operation for the purpose of the movement, placement, or removal of earth, rock, or other materials in or on the ground by use of mechanized equipment or by discharge of explosives, and including augering, backfilling, digging, ditching, drilling, grading, plowing-in, pulling-in, ripping, scraping, trenching and tunneling, but not including the tilling of soil for agricultural purposes; or the digging of holes for fence posts on private property in any area that is not located within a recorded easement of an operator or that is not located within one hundred feet (100') of the edge of the pavement of a street or highway. ‘Agricultural purposes’ includes surface activities, such as plowing, planting and combining, but does not include blasting, setting drainage tiles, subsoiling or other sub-surface activities”; and “Utility”, which read: “‘Utility’ means any line, system or facility used for producing, storing, conveying, transmitting, or distributing communications, electricity, gas, petroleum, petroleum products, hazardous liquids, water, steam, sewerage and other underground facilities; and”; and added the definitions of “Agricultural purposes”, “Blasting”, “Board”, “Design locate request”, “Excavator”, “Executive committee”, “Routine road maintenance activities” and “Willful noncompliance.”

The 2018 amendment added the definition of “contract locator”; and substituted “the Tennessee department of transportation, or any natural flowing runoff systems” for “or the Tennessee department of transportation” at the end of (B) in the definition of “utility”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.

Acts 2018, ch. 716, § 11. April 12, 2018.

65-31-103. Permits do not relieve liability.

A permit issued pursuant to law authorizing excavation or demolition operations shall not be deemed to relieve a person from the responsibility for complying with this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 3; T.C.A., § 65-3203.

65-31-104. Excavations without ascertainment of underground utilities prohibited.

Except as provided in § 65-31-109, no person may excavate in a street, highway, public space, a private easement of an operator or within one hundred feet (100') of the edge of the pavement of a street or highway, or demolish a building, without giving the notice required by § 65-31-106 in the manner prescribed by such section.

A general DIG certificate shall be issued for agricultural land as defined in § 67-5-1004 that lies outside a street, highway, public space or a private easement of an operator but within one hundred feet (100') of the edge of the pavement of a street or highway when no utilities are located within that area. The general certificate shall be valid until title to the land is transferred or until a utility line is located within the area.

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 4; T.C.A., § 65-3204; Acts 1993, ch. 223, § 4; 2007, ch. 218, §§ 2, 3, 5.

65-31-105. Filing requirements for utility operators.

Each operator, except operators participating in a one-call service, having underground facilities in a county, including those facilities that have been abandoned in place by the operator but not yet physically removed, shall file a notice with the register of deeds of the county that states that the operator has underground utilities located in that county, the name of the operator and the name, title, address, telephone number and electronic mail (e-mail address), if the representative has an e-mail address, of its representative designated to receive the written, telephonic or e-mail notice of intent required by § 65-31-106. It is only necessary that such notice shall consist of the fact that the operator possesses underground facilities in the listed counties. It is not necessary that the operator list the exact physical location of each and every item of its underground facilities in such counties.

Changes in any of the information contained in the list filed under subsection (a) shall be filed by the operator with the register of deeds of the county, or the register of deeds of each county in which these utilities are located, within thirty (30) working days of the change.

A filing fee as determined by the register of deeds may accompany the filing. These filings shall be filed and an index shall be maintained and kept up to date by the register's office.

The register of deeds shall, within one (1) working day, furnish to the party requesting such information, in writing when requested, a list of all operators having filed notices pursuant to subsection (a) and all other information regarding each such operator that has been filed with the register of deeds in accordance with subsection (a). When submitted in writing by the register of deeds, the information shall also include the name of the requesting party, and the date and time the register of deeds received the request from the requesting party.

After March 27, 1978, operators shall maintain records and drawings of all changes and additions to its underground facilities.

All underground utilities owned by an operator that are installed on or after January 1, 2017, shall be installed in a manner that will make those underground utilities locatable using a generally accepted electronic locating method.

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 5; T.C.A., § 65-3205; Acts 1993, ch. 223, §§ 5-7; 2006, ch. 686, § 1; 2015, ch. 488, § 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-1001, 8-1002.

65-31-106. Notice of intent to excavate or demolish.

Except as provided in § 65-31-109, before beginning any excavation or demolition operation described in § 65-31-104, other than an impending emergency as defined in § 65-31-102, each person responsible for such excavation or demolition shall serve written, telephonic or e-mail notice of intent to excavate or demolish at least three (3) working days prior to the actual date of excavation or demolition, but not more than ten (10) full working days prior to such time, unless a different period has been agreed to in writing by the person responsible for the excavation or demolition and the operator or designated representative. Should a period of time of fifteen (15) calendar days from the actual date specified to start excavation or demolition expire without the excavation or demolition being completed, then the person responsible for such excavation or demolition shall serve an additional written, telephonic or e-mail notice of intent to excavate or demolish at least three (3) working days prior to the expiration of time on the fifteenth calendar day.

If the proposed area of excavation or demolition is not served by the one-call service as provided in § 65-31-107, then the notice required by subsection (a) shall be served on each operator which has filed a list required by § 65-31-105 indicating that it has underground utilities located in the county where the excavation or demolition is to occur; or

If the proposed area of excavation or demolition is served by the one-call service, as provided for in § 65-31-107, the notice required by subsection (a) shall be served on such one-call service; provided, that where demolition of a building is proposed, each affected operator shall be given reasonable time to remove or protect its utilities before demolition of the building begins.

The written, telephonic or e-mail notice required by subsection (a) shall contain the name, address, telephone number and e-mail address of the person filing the notice of intent and, if different, the person responsible for the excavation or demolition, the starting date, the anticipated duration of the excavation or demolition, the type of excavation or demolition operation to be conducted, the specific location of the proposed excavation or demolition, and whether or not explosives are anticipated to be used. The location of the proposed area of excavation or demolition shall be designated by the person responsible for the excavation or demolition by marking such area with “safety white” color-coded stakes or white paint, unless:

The operator or its agent can determine the precise location of the proposed area of excavation based solely on the street address from a one-call service locate ticket because of the size of the property;

The operator or its agent can determine the precise location of the proposed area of excavation from a one-call service locate ticket that references a driveway or other easily identifiable point on the property and that identifies the property by street address or block and lot number;

The operator or its agent can determine the precise location of the proposed area of excavation from a one-call service locate ticket that identifies the property as being located on a street or road between two designed intersections of the street or road and two cross streets or roads when a street address or block and lot number is unavailable or does not apply; or

The person responsible for the excavation or demolition and all operators with underground facilities in the proposed area of excavation have had a meeting prior to the beginning of the excavation or demolition for the exchange of information on the location of the proposed excavation or demolition.

If the notification required by this section is made by telephone or e-mail, an adequate record of such notification shall be maintained by each notified operator or one-call service to document compliance with the requirements of this chapter, and a copy of this record shall be furnished by any operator or one-call service to the person giving notice of intent to excavate or demolish, when so requested by that person.

Except as provided in § 65-31-109, before beginning any excavation or demolition within one hundred feet (100') of the edge of the pavement of a street or highway when that area lies outside a street, highway, public space or a private easement of an operator, an excavator shall serve notice of the excavation or demolition at least three (3) working days before the actual date of excavation or demolition as set forth in this section. If after receiving proper notification as required in this section, an operator fails to locate its facilities within three (3) working days in the manner required by § 65-31-108, the excavator shall be authorized to proceed with the excavation. If an operator fails to locate its facilities within three (3) working days in the manner required by § 65-31-108 after receiving proper notification as required by this section and an underground facility of the operator is damaged by an excavator as a result of the operator's failure to discharge such duty, then the excavator shall not be liable for the damage; provided, that, if the excavator observes clear evidence of the presence of an unmarked utility in the area of the proposed excavation, the excavator shall exercise reasonable care to avoid damage to the utility that may be caused by the excavation, and the excavator shall be liable for damages arising from its failure to use reasonable care in such circumstances.

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 6; T.C.A., § 65-3206; Acts 1993, ch. 223, §§ 8-12; 1999, ch. 73, § 2; 2006, ch. 686, §§ 2-5; 2007, ch. 218, §§ 4, 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-1003, 8-1004.

65-31-107. Operator associations for mutual receipt of notifications.

Subject to the requirements of subsection (b), operators may form and operate a one-call service providing for mutual receipt of notifications of excavation or demolition operations, pursuant to § 65-31-106, in a defined geographical area. Any operator that suffers damage as a result of not participating in a one-call service providing for receipt of the notification of excavation or demolition operations in a defined geographic area, pursuant to § 65-31-106, waives the right to recover damages to the operator's underground utilities from the excavator; provided, that the provisions of this chapter were met by the excavator.

All operators are required to join the one-call service and utilize the services of the notification center as follows:

Operators that are members of the existing one-call service on May 20, 2015, shall remain members;

Operators with more than fifty thousand (50,000) customers served underground or one thousand (1,000) miles of facilities underground, who are not members, shall join the one-call service no later than January 1, 2016;

Operators with more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) customers served underground or five hundred (500) miles of facilities underground, who are not members, shall join the one-call service no later than January 1, 2017;

All operators that do not meet the thresholds described in subdivision (b)(1)(A), (b)(1)(B), or (b)(1)(C) shall join the one-call service no later than January 1, 2018; and

Failure of an operator as described in this subdivision (b)(1) to join the one-call service and utilize the services of the notification center in accordance with this section is a violation of this chapter and subjects the operator to the fines and penalties described in § 65-31-112.

This subsection (b) shall not apply to operators whose total amount of underground facilities constitutes less than twenty percent (20%) of their total utility plant in service.

There shall be only one (1) one-call service for this state.

The one-call service shall provide for a proportional method of apportioning the cost of operating the notification center among its members.

The one-call service shall provide training for those who have violated this chapter, unless otherwise determined by the board.

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 7; T.C.A., § 65-3207; Acts 1993, ch. 223, § 13; 1996, ch. 855, §§ 1-3; 1999, ch. 73, § 3; 2006, ch. 686, § 6; 2015, ch. 488, § 3; 2018, ch. 716, §§ 2, 3.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Subject to the requirements of subsection (b), operators” for “Operators” at the beginning of (a), rewrote (b), which read: “(b)(1) Natural gas distribution systems are required to belong to a one-call service formed in a geographical area in which such gas distribution systems operate.“(2) Only one (1) one-call service shall be formed and operated within a defined geographical area.”; and added (c) and (d).

The 2018 amendment added (b)(1)(E) and (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.

Acts 2018, ch. 716, § 11. April 12, 2018.

65-31-108. Response to notice of intent to excavate or demolish.

Each operator notified in accordance with § 65-31-106 shall stake or otherwise mark, prior to the noticed time of the proposed excavation or demolition, the surface of the tract or parcel of land affected by the excavation or demolition to indicate the approximate location of all its underground utilities that may be damaged as a result of the excavation or demolition. The operator shall not be required to indicate the depth of any such utility, but only the approximate ground location under which the utility is located. Such staking or other marking shall utilize the following color code:

SAFETY RED shall be used to mark electric power distribution and transmission facilities;

HIGH VISIBILITY SAFETY YELLOW shall be used to mark gas and oil distribution and transmission facilities;

SAFETY ALERT ORANGE shall be used to mark telephone, telegraph, cable television, video, and other telecommunications facilities;

SAFETY PRECAUTION BLUE shall be used to mark water systems facilities;

SAFETY GREEN shall be used to mark sewer systems facilities; and

SAFETY PURPLE shall be used to mark reclaimed water.

In the event more than one (1) operator uses the same color code under subdivision (a)(1)(A), each operator using the same color shall include a distinctive marking, such as the initials of the operator's name or other marking, that appropriately identifies each operator and sufficiently distinguishes each operator's marking from any other operator authorized to use the same color under subdivision (a)(1)(A).

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), the underground utility damage enforcement board may establish, by rule, best practices for uniform color code and marking consistent with this part. The rules may include stakes, flags, non-permanent paint, or other low impact marking practices. Rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, marking methods established by subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) shall be the methods of marking underground facilities in this state.

Each operator participating in a one-call service that has been notified in accordance with § 65-31-106 shall notify the one-call service that the operator has marked the approximate location of all of its underground utilities as required by this section or that the operator has no underground utilities in the proposed area of excavation. The operator shall provide this notice to the one-call service in accordance with procedures adopted by the one-call service for this notification. This notice shall fulfill the operator's obligation set forth in subsection (e). When each operator notified in accordance with § 65-31-106 has notified the one-call service that its underground utilities in the proposed area of excavation have been marked or that the operator has no underground utilities in the proposed area of excavation, the person responsible for the excavation or demolition may immediately proceed with the excavation or demolition, notwithstanding the minimum three-working-day notice requirement before excavation or demolition can begin set forth in § 65-31-106(a).

An excavator shall exercise reasonable care to avoid damage caused by an excavation or demolition within the safety zone around the marked location of the underground utilities. For the purpose of this section, “safety zone” means a strip of land at least four feet (4') wide, but not wider than the width of the utility plus two feet (2') on either side of the utility.

If, upon arrival at the site of a proposed excavation, the excavator observes clear evidence of the presence of an unmarked utility in the area of the proposed excavation, the excavator shall not begin excavating until an additional notice is made to the one-call. The excavator may then proceed, exercising reasonable care to avoid damage to the utility which may be caused by such excavation or demolition.

If no facilities exist in the tract or parcel of land, the operators shall make a reasonable effort to so advise the individual who initiated the request, provided the request is received in accordance with § 65-31-106.

The approximate location of underground utilities does not include a designation of location as to depth below the surface of the ground. Excavators must use reasonable care to ascertain for themselves the exact depth of the underground utilities below the surface of the ground. If, after so ascertaining, the excavator learns that its excavation or demolition is likely to interfere with the operation of the underground utility facilities, it must again notify the affected operator of such underground utility facilities and reasonably cooperate with the operator of the underground utility facilities to conduct its excavation or demolition in such a way that the operations of the underground utility facilities are not disturbed or the affected underground utility facilities are placed out of the way of the proposed excavation or demolition.

Each operator notified in accordance with § 65-31-109, shall within two (2) hours stake or otherwise mark, utilizing the color code set forth in subsection (a), the surface of the tract or parcel of land affected by the excavation or demolition to indicate the approximate location of all its underground utilities that may be damaged as a result of the excavation or demolition.

Each operator notified of an impending emergency, as defined in § 65-31-102, shall stake or otherwise mark, prior to the noticed time of the proposed excavation or demolition, utilizing the color code set forth in subsection (a), the surface of the tract or parcel of land affected by the excavation or demolition to indicate the approximate location of all its underground utilities that may be damaged as a result of the excavation or demolition.

Any contract locator acting on behalf of an operator is subject to this section.

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 8; T.C.A., § 65-3208; Acts 1993, ch. 223, § 14; 1999, ch. 73, § 4; 2006, ch. 686, §§ 7, 8; 2018, ch. 716, §§ 1, 6.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added present (a)(2) and redesignated former (a)(1) and (a)(2) as present (a)(1)(A) and (a)(1)(B); added (a)(2) and (a)(3); and (i).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 716, § 11. April 12, 2018.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-1003, 8-1004.

65-31-109. Emergency excavation or demolition.

Compliance with the notice requirements of § 65-31-106 is not required of any person responsible for emergency excavation or demolition, for repair or restoration of service or to ameliorate an imminent danger to life, health, or property; provided, that such person gives, as soon as practicable, oral notice of the emergency excavation or demolition to each operator having underground utilities located in the area or to a one-call service provided for in § 65-31-107, that serves an operator, where such excavation or demolition is to be performed and requests emergency assistance from each operator so identified in locating and providing immediate protection to the operator's underground utilities. “Emergency” means an imminent danger to life, health, or property, whenever there is a substantial likelihood that loss of life, health or property will result before the procedures under §§ 65-31-106 and 65-31-108 can be fully complied with.

Any excavator providing a misrepresentation of an emergency excavation as stated in subsection (a), or an “impending emergency,” as defined in § 65-31-102, shall be subject to the penalties stated in § 65-31-112.

For the purposes of this section, repair or replacement of an existing traffic control device at its existing location and existing depth shall be considered an emergency, and compliance with the notice requirements of this section and § 65-31-106 shall not be required of any local or state government responding to the emergency repair or replacement of a traffic control device.

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 9; T.C.A., § 65-3209; Acts 1993, ch. 223, § 15; 1999, ch. 73, § 5; 2015, ch. 488, § 4.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.

65-31-110. Precautions to avoid damage.

In addition to the notification requirements of § 65-31-106, each person responsible for any excavation or demolition operation designated in § 65-31-104 shall:

Plan the excavation or demolition to avoid damage to and minimize interference with underground utilities in and near the construction area;

Maintain a clearance between an underground utility and the cutting edge or point of any mechanized equipment in accordance with § 65-31-108(b) and (d), taking into account the known limit of control of such cutting edge or point, as may be reasonably necessary to avoid damage to such utility;

Provide such support and protection for underground utilities in and near the construction area, including during backfill operations, as may be reasonably necessary for the protection of such utilities; and

Each utility, regardless of the use or material, shall be installed with sufficient clearance to permit the maintenance of existing utilities, and to protect against damage to existing utilities.

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 10; T.C.A., § 65-3210; Acts 1993, ch. 223, §§ 16-18; 2001, ch. 120, §§ 1, 2.

65-31-111. Notice of excavation or demolition damage.

Except as provided by subsection (b), each person responsible for any excavation or demolition operation described in § 65-31-104 that results in any damage to an underground utility shall, immediately upon discovery of such damage, notify the operator of such utility of the location and nature of the damage and shall allow the operator reasonable time to accomplish necessary repairs before completing the excavation or demolition in the immediate area of such utility.

Each person responsible for any excavation or demolition operation described in § 65-31-104 that results in damage to an underground utility permitting the escape of any flammable, toxic, or corrosive gas or liquid shall, immediately upon discovery of such damage, notify the operator, police and fire departments, and take any other action as may be reasonably necessary to protect persons and property and to minimize the hazards until arrival of the operator's personnel or police and fire departments.

During initial excavation, if an underground utility is found to be unsound due to deterioration, the person responsible for excavation shall immediately notify the utility company involved and shall allow the operator reasonable time to accomplish necessary repairs before completing the excavation or demolition in the immediate area of such utility.

The financial impact of all damages to underground utilities shall be calculated using generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP).

Each operator whose utility facilities have been damaged shall report the incident using the Damage Information Reporting Tool (DIRT) utilized by the Common Ground Alliance.

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 11; T.C.A., § 65-3211; Acts 1993, ch. 223, § 19; 2006, ch. 686, § 10; 2015, ch. 488, § 5.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.